latvian.utf8.aff
#shitas neder 4 grupai
# - ĀĒ-ae
flag *%:
   [^GKR]T    > OŠA
   [^GKR]T    > OŠĀ
   [^GKR]T    > OŠAI
   [^GKR]T    > OŠAIS
   [^GKR]T    > OŠAJĀ
   [^GKR]T    > OŠAJAI
   [^GKR]T    > OŠAJAM
   [^GKR]T    > OŠAJĀM
   [^GKR]T    > OŠAJĀS
   [^GKR]T    > OŠAJIEM
   [^GKR]T    > OŠAJOS
   [^GKR]T    > OŠAM
   [^GKR]T    > OŠĀM
   [^GKR]T    > OŠAS
   [^GKR]T    > OŠĀS
   [^GKR]T    > OŠI
   [^GKR]T    > OŠIE
   [^GKR]T    > OŠIEM
   [^GKR]T    > OŠO
   [^GKR]T    > OŠOS
   [^GKR]T    > OŠS
   [^GKR]T    > OŠU
   [^GKR]T    > OŠUS
   [^GKR]T    > AMS
   [^GKR]T    > AMA
   [^GKR]T    > AMĀ
   [^GKR]T    > AMAI
   [^GKR]T    > AMAIS
   [^GKR]T    > AMAJĀ
   [^GKR]T    > AMAJAI
   [^GKR]T    > AMAJAM
   [^GKR]T    > AMAJĀM
   [^GKR]T    > AMAJĀS
   [^GKR]T    > AMAJIEM
   [^GKR]T    > AMAJOS
   [^GKR]T    > AMAM
   [^GKR]T    > AMĀM
   [^GKR]T    > AMAS
   [^GKR]T    > AMĀS
   [^GKR]T    > AMI
   [^GKR]T    > AMIE
   [^GKR]T    > AMIEM
   [^GKR]T    > AMO
   [^GKR]T    > AMOS
   [^GKR]T    > AMU
   [^GKR]T    > AMUS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠA
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠĀ
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠAI
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠAIS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠAJĀ
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠAJAI
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠAJAM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠAJĀM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠAJĀS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠAJIEM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠAJOS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠAM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠĀM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠAS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠĀS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠI
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠIE
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠIEM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠO
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠOS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠU
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > OŠUS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMA
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMĀ
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMAI
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMAIS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMAJĀ
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMAJAI
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMAJAM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMAJĀM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMAJĀS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMAJIEM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMAJOS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMAM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMĀM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMAS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMĀS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMI
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMIE
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMIEM
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMO
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMOS
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMU
   [^ĀĒ][R]T    > AMUS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠA
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠĀ
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠAI
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠAIS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠAJĀ
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠAJAI
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠAJAM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠAJĀM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠAJĀS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠAJIEM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠAJOS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠAM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠĀM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠAS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠĀS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠI
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠIE
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠIEM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠO
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠOS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠU
   [G]T    > -GT,DZOŠUS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMA
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMĀ
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMAI
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMAIS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMAJĀ
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMAJAI
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMAJAM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMAJĀM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMAJĀS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMAJIEM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMAJOS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMAM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMĀM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMAS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMĀS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMI
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMIE
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMIEM
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMO
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMOS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMU
   [G]T    > -GT,DZAMUS
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠA
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠĀ
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠAI
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠAIS
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠAJĀ
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠAJAI
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠAJAM
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠAJĀM
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠAJĀS
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠAJIEM
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠAJOS
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠAM
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠĀM
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠAS
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠĀS
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠI
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠIE
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠIEM
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠO
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠOS
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠS
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠU
   [K]T    > -KT,COŠUS
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMS
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMA
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMĀ
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMAI
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMAIS
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMAJĀ
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMAJAI
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMAJAM
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMAJĀM
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMAJĀS
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMAJIEM
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMAJOS
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMAM
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMĀM
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMAS
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMĀS
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMI
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMIE
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMIEM
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMO
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMOS
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMU
   [K]T    > -KT,CAMUS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠA
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠĀ
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠAI
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠAIS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠAJĀ
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠAJAI
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠAJAM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠAJĀM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠAJĀS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠAJIEM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠAJOS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠAM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠĀM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠAS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠĀS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠI
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠIE
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠIEM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠO
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠOS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠU
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,AROŠUS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMA
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMĀ
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMAI
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMAIS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMAJĀ
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMAJAI
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMAJAM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMAJĀM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMAJĀS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMAJIEM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMAJOS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMAM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMĀM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMAS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMĀS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMI
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMIE
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMIEM
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMO
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMOS
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMU
   [Ā]RT    > -ĀRT,ARAMUS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠA
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠĀ
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠAI
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠAIS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠAJĀ
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠAJAI
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠAJAM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠAJĀM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠAJĀS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠAJIEM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠAJOS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠAM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠĀM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠAS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠĀS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠI
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠIE
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠIEM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠO
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠOS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠU
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,EROŠUS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMA
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMĀ
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMAI
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMAIS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMAJĀ
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMAJAI
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMAJAM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMAJĀM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMAJĀS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMAJIEM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMAJOS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMAM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMĀM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMAS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMĀS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMI
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMIE
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMIEM
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMO
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMOS
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMU
   [Ē]RT    > -ĒRT,ERAMUS

#
#Divdabji is/usi // uŠais/usĪ
#
flag *e:
   T    > -T,IS
   T    > -T,UŠA
   T    > -T,UŠAM
   T    > -T,UŠU
   T    > -T,UŠĀ
   T    > -T,USI
   T    > -T,UŠAS
   T    > -T,UŠAI
   T    > -T,UŠI
   T    > -T,UŠIEM
   T    > -T,UŠUS
   T    > -T,UŠOS
   T    > -T,UŠĀM
   T    > -T,UŠĀS
   T    > -T,UŠAIS
   T    > -T,UŠAJAM
   T    > -T,UŠO
   T    > -T,UŠAJĀ
   T    > -T,USĪ
   T    > -T,UŠAJAI
   T    > -T,UŠIE
   T    > -T,UŠAJIEM
   T    > -T,UŠAJOS
   T    > -T,UŠAJĀM
   T    > -T,UŠAJĀS


#arĪ Īt - no V grupas
flag *a:
   [^GĪKLŪ]T    > -T,IS
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠA
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠAM
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠU
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠĀ
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,USI
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠAS
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠAI
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠI
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠIEM
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠUS
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠOS
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠĀM
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠĀS
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠAIS
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠAJAM
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠO
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠAJĀ
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,USĪ
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠAJAI
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠIE
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠAJIEM
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠAJOS
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠAJĀM
   [^LŪĪ]T    > -T,UŠAJĀS
   [K]T    > -KT,CIS
   [G]T    > -GT,DZIS
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVIS
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠA
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠAM
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠU
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠĀ
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUSI
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠAS
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠAI
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠI
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠIEM
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠUS
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠOS
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠĀM
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠĀS
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠAIS
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠAJAM
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠO
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠAJĀ
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUSĪ
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠAJAI
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠIE
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠAJIEM
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠAJOS
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠAJĀM
   [Ū]T    > -ŪT,UVUŠAJĀS
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INIS
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠA
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠAM
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠU
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠĀ
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUSI
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠAS
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠAI
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠI
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠIEM
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠUS
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠOS
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠĀM
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠĀS
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠAIS
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠAJAM
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠO
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠAJĀ
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUSĪ
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠAJAI
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠIE
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠAJIEM
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠAJOS
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠAJĀM
   [Ī]T    > -ĪT,INUŠAJĀS
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,IS
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠA
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠAM
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠU
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠĀ
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,USI
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠAS
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠAI
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠI
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠIEM
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠUS
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠOS
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠĀM
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠĀS
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠAIS
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠAJAM
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠO
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠAJĀ
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,USĪ
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠAJAI
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠIE
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠAJIEM
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠAJOS
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠAJĀM
   [^EIU]LT    > -T,UŠAJĀS
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLIS
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠA
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠAM
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠU
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠĀ
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUSI
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠAS
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠAI
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠI
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠIEM
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠUS
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠOS
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠĀM
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠĀS
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠAIS
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠAJAM
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠO
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠAJĀ
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUSĪ
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠAJAI
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠIE
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠAJIEM
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠAJOS
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠAJĀM
   [E]LT    > -ELT,ĒLUŠAJĀS
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLIS
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠA
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠAM
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠU
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠĀ
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUSI
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠAS
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠAI
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠI
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠIEM
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠUS
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠOS
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠĀM
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠĀS
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠAIS
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠAJAM
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠO
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠAJĀ
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUSĪ
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠAJAI
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠIE
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠAJIEM
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠAJOS
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠAJĀM
   [I]LT    > -ILT,ĪLUŠAJĀS
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLIS
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠA
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠAM
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠU
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠĀ
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUSI
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠAS
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠAI
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠI
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠIEM
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠUS
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠOS
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠĀM
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠĀS
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠAIS
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠAJAM
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠO
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠAJĀ
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUSĪ
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠAJAI
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠIE
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠAJIEM
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠAJOS
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠAJĀM
   [U]LT    > -ULT,ŪLUŠAJĀS
